Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1610
Salaries, offices, staff, equipment.

Salaries, offices, support staff, equipment, furnishings, and supplies for a child support referee shall be provided by the county and state through funds appropriated by the county and state to the district court, separate juvenile court, and county court. If the Supreme Court appoints a referee to serve in more than one judicial district pursuant to section 43-1609, the salary and necessary travel expenses of the referee shall be paid by funds appropriated by the state to the Supreme Court.

Laws 1989, LB 265, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 22;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 50.